Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,137
Evidence of violation; refer to prosecuting attorney.

The director may refer such evidence as may be available concerning violations of the Nebraska Criminal Code or of any rule and regulation or order under Chapter 8 or under the Credit Union Act to the Attorney General or the proper county attorney. It shall be the duty of each county attorney or the Attorney General to whom the director reports a violation to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted, if appropriate, without delay.

Laws 1984, LB 1039, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 908, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 120;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 127.

Credit Union Act, see section 21-1701.

Nebraska Criminal Code, see section 28-101.